lt-LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 8012 Y 2
SFX 8012 ėsti ėsė/430 . 302
SFX 8012 ėstis ėsėsi/430 . 302

SFX 8013 Y 2
SFX 8013 ėsti ėsė/431 . 302
SFX 8013 ėstis ėsėsi/431 . 302

SFX 8017 Y 2
SFX 8017 ėti ėti/408 . 300
SFX 8017 ėtis ėtis/408 . 300

SFX 8018 Y 2
SFX 8018 ėti ėti/409 . 300
SFX 8018 ėtis ėtis/409 . 300

SFX 8019 Y 2
SFX 8019 ėti ėti/410 . 300
SFX 8019 ėtis ėtis/410 . 300

SFX 8020 Y 2
SFX 8020 ėti ėti/411 . 300
SFX 8020 ėtis ėtis/411 . 300

SFX 8021 Y 2
SFX 8021 ėti ėti/412 . 300
SFX 8021 ėtis ėtis/412 . 300

SFX 8022 Y 2
SFX 8022 ėti ėti/413 . 300
SFX 8022 ėtis ėtis/413 . 300

SFX 8023 Y 2
SFX 8023 ėti ėti/414 . 300
SFX 8023 ėtis ėtis/414 . 300

SFX 8024 Y 2
SFX 8024 ėti ėti/415 . 300
SFX 8024 ėtis ėtis/415 . 300

SFX 8025 Y 2
SFX 8025 ėti ėti/416 . 300
SFX 8025 ėtis ėtis/416 . 300

SFX 8026 Y 2
SFX 8026 ėti ėti/417 . 300
SFX 8026 ėtis ėtis/417 . 300

SFX 8037 Y 4
SFX 8037 ėti ėja/418 . 301
SFX 8037 ėtis ėjasi/418 . 301
SFX 8037 ėti i/418 . 301
SFX 8037 ėtis isi/418 . 301

SFX 8038 Y 4
SFX 8038 ėti ėja/419 . 301
SFX 8038 ėtis ėjasi/419 . 301
SFX 8038 ėti i/419 . 301
SFX 8038 ėtis isi/419 . 301

SFX 8039 Y 4
SFX 8039 ėti ėja/420 . 301
SFX 8039 ėtis ėjasi/420 . 301
SFX 8039 ėti i/420 . 301
SFX 8039 ėtis isi/420 . 301

SFX 8040 Y 4
SFX 8040 ėti ėja/421 . 301
SFX 8040 ėtis ėjasi/421 . 301
SFX 8040 ėti i/421 . 301
SFX 8040 ėtis isi/421 . 301

SFX 8041 Y 4
SFX 8041 ėti ėja/422 . 301
SFX 8041 ėtis ėjasi/422 . 301
SFX 8041 ėti i/422 . 301
SFX 8041 ėtis isi/422 . 301

SFX 8042 Y 4
SFX 8042 ėti ėja/423 . 301
SFX 8042 ėtis ėjasi/423 . 301
SFX 8042 ėti i/423 . 301
SFX 8042 ėtis isi/423 . 301

SFX 8043 Y 4
SFX 8043 ėti ėja/424 . 301
SFX 8043 ėtis ėjasi/424 . 301
SFX 8043 ėti i/424 . 301
SFX 8043 ėtis isi/424 . 301

SFX 8044 Y 4
SFX 8044 ėti ėja/425 . 301
SFX 8044 ėtis ėjasi/425 . 301
SFX 8044 ėti i/425 . 301
SFX 8044 ėtis isi/425 . 301

SFX 8045 Y 4
SFX 8045 ėti ėja/426 . 301
SFX 8045 ėtis ėjasi/426 . 301
SFX 8045 ėti i/426 . 301
SFX 8045 ėtis isi/426 . 301

SFX 8055 Y 2
SFX 8055 ėti ėjie/427 . 301
SFX 8055 ėti ie/427 . 301

SFX 8056 Y 2
SFX 8056 ėtis ėjie/428 . 301
SFX 8056 ėtis ie/428 . 301

SFX 8077 Y 2
SFX 8077 ėti ėjo/429 . 302
SFX 8077 ėtis ėjosi/429 . 302

SFX 8078 Y 2
SFX 8078 ėti ėjo/430 . 302
SFX 8078 ėtis ėjosi/430 . 302

SFX 8079 Y 2
SFX 8079 ėti ėjo/431 . 302
SFX 8079 ėtis ėjosi/431 . 302

SFX 8083 Y 2
SFX 8083 isti isti/408 . 300
SFX 8083 istis istis/408 . 300

SFX 8084 Y 2
SFX 8084 isti isti/409 . 300
SFX 8084 istis istis/409 . 300

SFX 8085 Y 2
SFX 8085 isti isti/410 . 300
SFX 8085 istis istis/410 . 300

SFX 8086 Y 2
SFX 8086 isti isti/411 . 300
SFX 8086 istis istis/411 . 300

SFX 8087 Y 2
SFX 8087 isti isti/412 . 300
SFX 8087 istis istis/412 . 300

SFX 8088 Y 2
SFX 8088 isti isti/413 . 300
SFX 8088 istis istis/413 . 300

SFX 8089 Y 2
SFX 8089 isti isti/414 . 300
SFX 8089 istis istis/414 . 300

SFX 8090 Y 2
SFX 8090 isti isti/415 . 300
SFX 8090 istis istis/415 . 300

SFX 8091 Y 2
SFX 8091 isti isti/416 . 300
SFX 8091 istis istis/416 . 300

SFX 8092 Y 2
SFX 8092 isti isti/417 . 300
SFX 8092 istis istis/417 . 300

SFX 8103 Y 2
SFX 8103 isti ysta/418 . 301
SFX 8103 istis ystasi/418 . 301

SFX 8104 Y 2
SFX 8104 isti ysta/419 . 301
SFX 8104 istis ystasi/419 . 301

SFX 8105 Y 2
SFX 8105 isti ysta/420 . 301
SFX 8105 istis ystasi/420 . 301

SFX 8106 Y 2
SFX 8106 isti ysta/421 . 301
SFX 8106 istis ystasi/421 . 301

SFX 8107 Y 2
SFX 8107 isti ysta/422 . 301
SFX 8107 istis ystasi/422 . 301

SFX 8108 Y 2
SFX 8108 isti ysta/423 . 301
SFX 8108 istis ystasi/423 . 301

SFX 8109 Y 2
SFX 8109 isti ysta/424 . 301
SFX 8109 istis ystasi/424 . 301

SFX 8110 Y 2
SFX 8110 isti ysta/425 . 301
SFX 8110 istis ystasi/425 . 301

SFX 8111 Y 2
SFX 8111 isti ysta/426 . 301
SFX 8111 istis ystasi/426 . 301

SFX 8121 Y 1
SFX 8121 isti ystie/427 . 301

SFX 8122 Y 1
SFX 8122 istis ystie/428 . 301

SFX 8123 Y 2
SFX 8123 isti iso/429 . 302
SFX 8123 istis isosi/429 . 302

SFX 8124 Y 2
SFX 8124 isti iso/430 . 302
SFX 8124 istis isosi/430 . 302

SFX 8125 Y 2
SFX 8125 isti iso/431 . 302
SFX 8125 istis isosi/431 . 302

SFX 8129 Y 2
SFX 8129 ūti ūti/408 . 300
SFX 8129 ūtis ūtis/408 . 300

SFX 8130 Y 2
SFX 8130 ūti ūti/438 . 300
SFX 8130 ūtis ūtis/438 . 300

SFX 8131 Y 2
SFX 8131 ūti ūti/410 . 300
SFX 8131 ūtis ūtis/410 . 300

SFX 8132 Y 2
SFX 8132 ūti ūti/411 . 300
SFX 8132 ūtis ūtis/411 . 300

SFX 8133 Y 2
SFX 8133 ūti ūti/412 . 300
SFX 8133 ūtis ūtis/412 . 300

SFX 8134 Y 2
SFX 8134 ūti ūti/413 . 300
SFX 8134 ūtis ūtis/413 . 300

SFX 8135 Y 2
SFX 8135 ūti ūti/414 . 300
SFX 8135 ūtis ūtis/414 . 300

SFX 8136 Y 2
SFX 8136 ūti ūti/415 . 300
SFX 8136 ūtis ūtis/415 . 300

SFX 8137 Y 2
SFX 8137 ūti ūti/416 . 300
SFX 8137 ūtis ūtis/416 . 300

SFX 8138 Y 2
SFX 8138 ūti ūti/417 . 300
SFX 8138 ūtis ūtis/417 . 300

SFX 8149 Y 4
SFX 8149 ūti ūva/418 . 301
SFX 8149 ūtis ūvasi/418 . 301
SFX 8149 ūti ūna/418 . 301
SFX 8149 ūtis ūnasi/418 . 301

SFX 8150 Y 4
SFX 8150 ūti ūva/419 . 301
SFX 8150 ūtis ūvasi/419 . 301
SFX 8150 ūti ūna/419 . 301
SFX 8150 ūtis ūnasi/419 . 301

SFX 8151 Y 4
SFX 8151 ūti ūva/420 . 301
SFX 8151 ūtis ūvasi/420 . 301
SFX 8151 ūti ūna/420 . 301
SFX 8151 ūtis ūnasi/420 . 301

SFX 8152 Y 4
SFX 8152 ūti ūva/421 . 301
SFX 8152 ūtis ūvasi/421 . 301
SFX 8152 ūti ūna/421 . 301
SFX 8152 ūtis ūnasi/421 . 301

SFX 8153 Y 4
SFX 8153 ūti ūva/422 . 301
SFX 8153 ūtis ūvasi/422 . 301
SFX 8153 ūti ūna/422 . 301
SFX 8153 ūtis ūnasi/422 . 301

SFX 8154 Y 4
SFX 8154 ūti ūva/423 . 301
SFX 8154 ūtis ūvasi/423 . 301
SFX 8154 ūti ūna/423 . 301
SFX 8154 ūtis ūnasi/423 . 301

SFX 8155 Y 4
SFX 8155 ūti ūva/424 . 301
SFX 8155 ūtis ūvasi/424 . 301
SFX 8155 ūti ūna/424 . 301
SFX 8155 ūtis ūnasi/424 . 301

SFX 8156 Y 4
SFX 8156 ūti ūva/425 . 301
SFX 8156 ūtis ūvasi/425 . 301
SFX 8156 ūti ūna/425 . 301
SFX 8156 ūtis ūnasi/425 . 301

SFX 8157 Y 4
SFX 8157 ūti ūva/426 . 301
SFX 8157 ūtis ūvasi/426 . 301
SFX 8157 ūti ūna/426 . 301
SFX 8157 ūtis ūnasi/426 . 301

SFX 8167 Y 2
SFX 8167 ūti ūvie/427 . 301
SFX 8167 ūti ūnie/427 . 301

SFX 8168 Y 2
SFX 8168 ūtis ūvie/428 . 301
SFX 8168 ūtis ūnie/428 . 301

SFX 8189 Y 2
SFX 8189 ūti uvo/429 . 302
SFX 8189 ūtis uvosi/429 . 302

SFX 8190 Y 2
SFX 8190 ūti uvo/430 . 302
SFX 8190 ūtis uvosi/430 . 302

SFX 8191 Y 2
SFX 8191 ūti uvo/431 . 302
SFX 8191 ūtis uvosi/431 . 302

SFX 8195 Y 2
SFX 8195 arti arti/408 . 300
SFX 8195 artis artis/408 . 300

SFX 8196 Y 2
SFX 8196 arti arti/409 . 300
SFX 8196 artis artis/409 . 300

SFX 8197 Y 2
SFX 8197 arti arti/410 . 300
SFX 8197 artis artis/410 . 300

SFX 8198 Y 2
SFX 8198 arti arti/411 . 300
SFX 8198 artis artis/411 . 300

SFX 8199 Y 2
SFX 8199 arti arti/412 . 300
SFX 8199 artis artis/412 . 300

SFX 8200 Y 2
SFX 8200 arti arti/413 . 300
SFX 8200 artis artis/413 . 300

SFX 8201 Y 2
SFX 8201 arti arti/414 . 300
SFX 8201 artis artis/414 . 300

SFX 8202 Y 2
SFX 8202 arti arti/415 . 300
SFX 8202 artis artis/415 . 300

SFX 8203 Y 2
SFX 8203 arti arti/416 . 300
SFX 8203 artis artis/416 . 300

SFX 8204 Y 2
SFX 8204 arti arti/417 . 300
SFX 8204 artis artis/417 . 300

SFX 8215 Y 2
SFX 8215 arti aria/418 . 301
SFX 8215 artis ariasi/418 . 301

SFX 8216 Y 2
SFX 8216 arti aria/419 . 301
SFX 8216 artis ariasi/419 . 301

SFX 8217 Y 2
SFX 8217 arti aria/420 . 301
SFX 8217 artis ariasi/420 . 301

SFX 8218 Y 2
SFX 8218 arti aria/421 . 301
SFX 8218 artis ariasi/421 . 301

SFX 8219 Y 2
SFX 8219 arti aria/422 . 301
SFX 8219 artis ariasi/422 . 301

SFX 8220 Y 2
SFX 8220 arti aria/423 . 301
SFX 8220 artis ariasi/423 . 301

SFX 8221 Y 2
SFX 8221 arti aria/424 . 301
SFX 8221 artis ariasi/424 . 301

SFX 8222 Y 2
SFX 8222 arti aria/425 . 301
SFX 8222 artis ariasi/425 . 301

SFX 8223 Y 2
SFX 8223 arti aria/426 . 301
SFX 8223 artis ariasi/426 . 301

SFX 8233 Y 1
SFX 8233 arti arie/427 . 301

SFX 8234 Y 1
SFX 8234 artis arie/428 . 301

SFX 8235 Y 2
SFX 8235 arti orė/429 . 302
SFX 8235 artis orėsi/429 . 302

SFX 8236 Y 2
SFX 8236 arti orė/430 . 302
SFX 8236 artis orėsi/430 . 302

SFX 8237 Y 2
SFX 8237 arti orė/431 . 302
SFX 8237 artis orėsi/431 . 302

AF 8129,8130,8149,8189,9999 # 129
AF 8195,8196,8215,8235,9999 # 236
AF 8017,8018,8037,8077,9999 # 331
AF 8083,8084,8103,8123,9999 # 344
