lt-LT.dic
apibūti/129	11
apipūti/129	11
atbūti/129	11
begriūti/129	11
besikarti/236	13
griūti/129	11
išbūti/129	11
išgriūti/129	11
iškarti/236	11
išpūti/129	11
karti/236	11
kartis/236	13
kliūti/129	11
neapgriūti/129	33
neapipūti/129	33
neatbūti/129	33
nebegriūti/129	33
nebeišbūti/129	33
nebekarti/236	33
nebekliūti/129	33
nebenugriūti/129	33
nebepakarti/236	33
nebepakliūti/129	33
nebepasikarti/236	34
nebepūti/129	33
nebesikarti/236	34
nebeskeldėti/331	33
nebeužgriūti/129	33
nebeužkliūti/129	33
nebeužsibūti/129	34
nebeįkliūti/129	33
negriūti/129	33
neišbūti/129	33
neišgriūti/129	33
neiškarti/236	33
neišpūti/129	33
nekarti/236	33
nekliūti/129	33
nenugriūti/129	33
nenukarti/236	33
nenupūti/129	33
nepabūti/129	33
nepakarti/236	33
nepakliūti/129	33
nepapūti/129	33
nepargriūti/129	33
nepasibūti/129	34
nepasikarti/236	34
neperpūti/129	33
neprabūti/129	33
nepradvisti/344	33
neprapūti/129	33
nepribūti/129	33
neprivisti/344	33
nepūti/129	33
nesikarti/236	34
neskeldėti/331	33
nesugriūti/129	33
nesukarti/236	33
nesupūti/129	33
nesuskeldėti/331	33
neužgriūti/129	33
neužkarti/236	33
neužkliūti/129	33
neužsibūti/129	34
neužsikarti/236	34
neįgristi/344	33
neįgriūti/129	33
neįkliūti/129	33
nugriūti/129	11
nukarti/236	11
nupūti/129	11
pabūti/129	11
pagristi/344	11
pakarti/236	11
pakliūti/129	11
papūti/129	11
pargriūti/129	11
pasibūti/129	13
pasikarti/236	13
pavėdėti/331	11
perpūti/129	11
persikarti/236	13
prabūti/129	11
pradvisti/344	11
prapūti/129	11
pribūti/129	11
pridvisti/344	11
prisikarti/236	13
privisti/344	11
pūti/129	11
skeldėti/331	11
sudvisti/344	11
sugriūti/129	11
sukarti/236	11
supūti/129	11
suskeldėti/331	11
teatbūti/129	11
tebegriūti/129	11
tebekarti/236	11
tebekliūti/129	11
tebepakliūti/129	11
tebepūti/129	11
tegriūti/129	11
teišbūti/129	11
tekliūti/129	11
tepabūti/129	11
tepakliūti/129	11
tepasikarti/236	13
teprivisti/344	11
tesukarti/236	11
tesupūti/129	11
teužsibūti/129	13
užkarti/236	11
užkliūti/129	11
užsikarti/236	13
įgristi/344	11
įgriūti/129	11
įsibūti/129	13
įsikarti/236	13
